DI-290 DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVEHEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION &
SKYHOOK TEMS

DI3H0-03

DTC C 1796 / 96 Center DIFF. Lock Position Switch
Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

This circuit is sending the signal to the ECU by detecting that the transfer center differential is in the "LOCK”
condition.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

« Center diff. lock position switch
C1796/96 Center diff. lock position switch signal does not change.  Center diff. lock position switch circuit
 Suspension control ECU
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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DI-292 DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVEHEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION &
SKYHOOK TEMS

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check output signal of center diff. lock position switch.

INCASEOFUSINGHAND -HELDTESTER:
PREPARATION:
(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.
(b) Turntheignition switch ON and pushthe hand -heldtester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.
CHECK:
Checkthe center diff. lock position switch condition displayed on the hand —heldtester when pushingthe
center diff. lock switch.
OK:
When the center diff. lock switch pushed once:
”ON” is displayed for center diff. lock position switch condition.
When the center diff. lock switch pushed twice:
”OFF” is displayed for center diff. lock position switch condition.

ON INCASEOFNOTUSINGHAND -HELDTESTER:
@ EXI PREPARATION:
}%{iﬁﬁlﬂ @ Remove the suspension control ECU with connectors still con-
nected.
CHECK:
/TN (@  Turn the ignition switch ON.
Q// (b) Measure voltage between terminal EXI of suspension
J_ control ECU connector and body ground when the center
= F05760 diff. lock switchis pushed twice.
OK:
Center diff. lock Switch condition Voltage
Pushed once Below 1.5V
Pushed twice 9-14V

0K> No problem.

(]
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DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVE HEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION & DI-293

SKYHOOK TEMS

2 [ Check center diff. lock position switch.

A
{ ),

F05759

OK
~_—

PREPARATION:

(@) Disconnectthe center diff. lock position switch connector.

(b) Remove the center diff. lock position switch (See page
TR-9).

CHECK:

Measure resistance between the terminal 1 and 2 of center diff.

lock position switch connector when the center diff. lock posi-

tion switch pushed and released.

OK:
Switch condition Resistance
Pushed 0 Q (Continuity)
Released o Q (Open)

NG> Replace center diff. lock position switch.

3 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between center diff.
lock position switch and suspension control ECU (See page IN-35).

@

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

Check and replace suspension control ECU.
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